Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2903
Building; use; rules and regulations; agreements; funds.

The county board of any county may (1) make such rules and regulations as may be appropriate with respect to the use of any such building, including fees and charges for such use, (2) enter into agreements with any city, village, or school district in such county with respect to the use, maintenance, and support of any such building, and (3) use any available funds including federal revenue-sharing funds to aid in the equipping of any such building.

Laws 1977, LB 29, § 3.